Vermont, session 2025-2026, H606.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2307 is amended to read:
§ 2307. FIREARMS RELINQUISHED PURSUANT TO RELIEF FROM
ABUSE ORDER OR EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDER;
STORAGE; FEES; RETURN
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Federally licensed firearms dealer” means a licensed importer,
licensed manufacturer, or licensed dealer required to conduct national instant
criminal background checks under 18 U.S.C. § 922(t).
(2) “Firearm” shall have has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C.
§ 921(a)(3).
(3) “Law enforcement agency” means the Vermont State Police, a
municipal police department, or a sheriff’s department.
(4) “Third party” means a person other than a cooperating law
enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed firearms dealer.
(b) Relinquishment.
(1) A person who is required to relinquish firearms, ammunition, or
other weapons in the person’s possession by a court order issued under
15 V.S.A. chapter 21 (abuse prevention); 13 V.S.A. chapter 85, subchapter 2
(extreme risk protection orders); or any other provision of law consistent with
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 2 of 19
2026
18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8) shall, unless the court orders an alternative
relinquishment pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, upon service of
the order immediately relinquish the firearms, ammunition, or weapons to a
cooperating law enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed
firearms dealer. As used in this subdivision, “person” means anyone who
meets the definition of “intimate partner” under 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(32) or who
qualifies as a family or household member under 15 V.S.A. § 1101, or any
person who is subject to an extreme risk protection order. The court may order
an alternative relinquishment to a third party if after a hearing the court finds
that the alternative relinquishment adequately protects the safety of the
protected parties.
(2)(A) The court may order that the person relinquish the firearms,
ammunition, or other weapons to a person other than a cooperating law
enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed firearms dealer unless
the court finds that relinquishment to the other person will not adequately
protect the safety of the victim.
(i) Firearms shall not be held by a third party unless approved by
the court using the process set forth in this subdivision (2).
(ii) A final relief from abuse hearing under 15 V.S.A. § 1103 or an
extreme risk protection order hearing under 13 V.S.A. § 4053 shall not be
continued solely for the purpose of approval of a third party. If the court is
unable to accommodate hearing from the proposed third party at the hearing or
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 3 of 19
2026
if the defendant is not prepared to present the third party, the defendant may
file a motion using a form approved by the court administrator to request a
hearing at a later date on whether the proposed third party should be permitted
to hold surrendered firearms.
(iii) To be considered as a third party eligible to hold surrendered
firearms, the third party shall agree to undergo a background check through the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) to verify that the
person is legally permitted to have a firearm. The background check required
by this subdivision (iii) shall be provided to the court.
(B) A person to whom firearms, ammunition, or other weapons are
relinquished pursuant to subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (b) The proposed
third party shall execute an affidavit on a form approved by the Court
Administrator stating that the person:
(i) acknowledges receipt of the firearms, ammunition, or other
weapons;
(ii) assumes responsibility for storage of the firearms,
ammunition, or other weapons until further order of the court, and specifies the
manner in which he or she the person will provide secure storage of such
items;
(iii) is not prohibited from owning or possessing firearms under
State or federal law; and
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 4 of 19
2026
(iv) understands the obligations and requirements of the court
order, including the potential for the person to be subject to civil contempt
proceedings pursuant to subdivision (2)(C) of this subsection subdivision
(b)(2) if the person permits the firearms, ammunition, or other weapons to be
possessed, accessed, or used by the person who relinquished the item or by any
other person not authorized by law to do so.
(C) A person to whom firearms, ammunition, or other weapons are
relinquished pursuant to subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (b) third party
shall be subject to civil contempt proceedings under 12 V.S.A. chapter 5 if the
person permits the firearms, ammunition, or other weapons to be possessed,
accessed, or used by the person who relinquished the item or by any other
person not authorized by law to do so. In the event that the person required to
relinquish the firearms, ammunition, or other weapons or any other person not
authorized by law to possess the relinquished items obtains access to,
possession of, or use of a relinquished item, all relinquished items shall be
immediately transferred to the possession of a law enforcement agency or
approved federally licensed firearms dealer pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection (b).
(c) Obligation to catalogue; evidentiary firearms excluded. A law
enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed firearms dealer that
takes possession of a firearm, ammunition, or other weapon pursuant to
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall photograph, catalogue, and store the
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 5 of 19
2026
item in accordance with standards and guidelines established by the
Department of Public Safety pursuant to subdivision (i)(3) subsection (k) of
this section. A firearm, ammunition, or other weapon shall not be taken into
possession pursuant to this section if it is being or may be used as evidence in a
pending criminal matter.
(d) Acknowledgement form. A defendant who is required to relinquish
firearms pursuant to a court order issued under 15 V.S.A. chapter 21 (abuse
prevention); 13 V.S.A. chapter 85, subchapter 2 (extreme risk protection
orders), or any other provision of law consistent with 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8)
shall complete a form approved by the court administrator acknowledging that
surrender has occurred and documenting the holder of the firearms. The form
shall be filed with the court or law enforcement, or both, as directed by the
court order.
(e) Fees.
(1) A law enforcement agency that stores firearms, ammunition, or
weapons pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section may charge the owner a
reasonable storage fee, not to exceed:
(A) $200.00 for the first firearm or weapon, and $50.00 for each
additional firearm or weapon for up to 15 months, prorated on the number of
months the items are stored; and
(B) $50.00 per firearm or weapon per year for each year or part
thereof thereafter.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 6 of 19
2026
(2) A federally licensed firearms dealer that stores firearms,
ammunition, or weapons pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section may
charge the owner a storage fee that is reasonably related to the expenses it
incurs in the administration of this section. Any federally licensed firearm
dealer that certifies compliance under this section shall provide a copy of its
fee schedule to the court Department of Public Safety upon request.
(3) Fees permitted by this subsection shall not begin to accrue until after
the court issues a final relief from abuse order pursuant to 15 V.S.A. § 1103 or
a final extreme risk protection order pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 4053.
(e)(f) Sale. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the lawful
sale of firearms or other items.
(f) A final relief from abuse order issued pursuant to 15 V.S.A. § 1103
requiring a person to relinquish firearms, ammunition, or other weapons shall
direct the law enforcement agency, approved federally licensed firearms
dealer, or other person in possession of the items under subsection (b) of this
section to release them to the owner upon expiration of the order if all
applicable fees have been paid.
(g) Law enforcement storage of firearms with a federally licensed firearms
dealer.
(1) Law enforcement agencies that do not have the capacity to store
firearms or do not elect to store nonevidentiary firearms may store
nonevidentiary firearms relinquished to them pursuant to a relief from abuse
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 7 of 19
2026
order, an extreme risk protection order, or any other provision of law
consistent with 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8) with a federally licensed firearms dealer,
provided that the agency provides timely notice to the person surrendering the
firearm of the transfer. The notice shall include the following information:
(A) The contact information for the federally licensed firearms
dealer, including the dealer’s name, phone number, and current address.
(B) It is the defendant’s responsibility to keep the federally licensed
firearms dealer informed of any address changes.
(C) The costs of the storage fees that the defendant will be
responsible for paying.
(D) If the defendant fails to retrieve the firearms within 90 days after
being eligible for release, the defendant forfeits ownership of the firearms and
the firearms may be sold and all proceeds retained by the federally licensed
firearms dealer or law enforcement agency that provided storage.
(E) Information about how to file a request with the court to have a
third party provide storage.
(F) The eligibility requirements that a proposed third party is required
to meet to hold firearms.
(2) The notice required by subdivision (1) of this subsection may be
provided by the federally licensed firearms dealer to the defendant directly,
provided that the dealer or law enforcement agency, or both, keeps a record to
document that notice was provided.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 8 of 19
2026
(3) Law enforcement agencies that store nonevidentiary firearms with a
federally licensed firearms dealer shall provide the dealer with:
(A) the name of the owner of the firearms;
(B) contact information for the owner to include name, date of birth,
phone number, and current address;
(C) docket information about the court order requiring firearms
surrender; and
(D) if requested by the dealer, information about any changes to the
court order.
(4) Federally licensed firearms dealers shall not be used to store firearms
relinquished pursuant to a temporary relief from abuse order issued pursuant to
15 V.S.A. § 1104 or a temporary extreme risk protection order issued pursuant
to 13 V.S.A. § 4054 unless the defendant consents to have the dealer hold the
firearms and agrees to pay storage fees that accrue while the temporary order is
in effect.
(h) Victim notification of release of firearms. Prior to releasing firearms
under this section, law enforcement agencies shall make reasonable efforts to
provide notice to the plaintiff at least 24 hours in advance before the firearms
are released unless the plaintiff is present in court when the court order
requiring relinquishment is dismissed and is orally informed on the record that
firearms will be released.
(i) Release of firearms.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 9 of 19
2026
(1) A law enforcement agency, an approved federally licensed firearms
dealer, or any other person that takes possession of firearms, ammunition, or
weapons for storage purposes pursuant to this section shall not release the
items to the owner without a court order unless the items are to be sold
pursuant to subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection. If a court orders the release
of firearms, ammunition, or weapons stored under this section, the law
enforcement agency or firearms dealer in possession of the items shall make
them available to the owner within three business days of receipt of the order
and in a manner consistent with federal law 72 hours after completion of a
background check through the National Instant Criminal Background Check
System (NICS). The Supreme Court may promulgate rules under 12 V.S.A.
§ 1 for judicial proceedings under this subsection.
(2)(A)(i) If the owner fails to retrieve the firearm, ammunition, or
weapon and pay the applicable storage fee within 90 days of following the
court order releasing the items, the firearm, ammunition, or weapon may be
sold for fair market value. Title to the items shall pass to the law enforcement
agency or firearms dealer for the purpose of transferring ownership, except that
the Vermont State Police shall follow the procedure described in section 2305
of this title.
(ii) The law enforcement agency or approved firearms dealer shall
make a reasonable effort to notify the owner of the sale before it occurs. In no
event shall the sale occur until after the court issues a final relief from abuse
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 10 of 19
2026
order pursuant to 15 V.S.A. § 1103 or a final extreme risk protection order
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 4053.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (2)(A), “reasonable effort” shall
mean means notice shall be served as provided for by Rule 4 of the Vermont
Rules of Civil Procedure.
(B) Proceeds from the sale of a firearm, ammunition, or weapon
pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be apportioned as
follows:
(i) unpaid storage fees and associated costs, including the costs of
sale and of locating and serving the owner, shall be paid to the law
enforcement agency or firearms dealer that incurred the cost; and
(ii) any proceeds remaining after payment is made to the law
enforcement agency or firearms dealer pursuant to subdivision (i) of this
subdivision (2)(B) shall be paid to the original owner If firearms eligible for
release are not claimed by the owner, the federally licensed firearms dealer or
law enforcement agency storing the firearms shall provide a certified letter to
the owner’s last known address. If the firearms are not claimed within 90 days
after notice by certified letter, the firearms may be sold by the dealer or law
enforcement agency and the dealer or law enforcement agency may retain all
proceeds from the sale.
(h)(j) Immunity.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 11 of 19
2026
(1) A federally licensed firearms dealer or law enforcement agency that
stores firearms in accordance with this section shall be immune from:
(A) civil or criminal liability for the sale of firearms, provided that
notice is provided as required by subsection (g) of this section; and
(B) civil or criminal liability for any damage or deterioration of
firearms, ammunition, or weapons stored or transported pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) This subsection shall not apply if the damage or deterioration
occurred as a result of recklessness, gross negligence, or intentional
misconduct by the law enforcement agency or federally licensed firearms
dealer.
(i)(k) Department of Public Safety. The Department of Public Safety shall
be responsible for the implementation and establishment of standards and
guidelines to carry out this section. To carry out this responsibility, the
Department shall:
(1) Establish minimum standards to be a qualified storage location and
maintain a list of qualified storage locations, including:
(A) federally licensed firearms dealers that annually certify
compliance with the Department’s standards to receive firearms, ammunition,
or other weapons pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section; and
(B) cooperating law enforcement agencies.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 12 of 19
2026
(2) Adopt a policy that encourages and supports federally licensed
firearms dealers to provide storage for prohibited persons.
(3) Establish a fee schedule consistent with the fees established in this
section for the storage of firearms and other weapons by law enforcement
agencies pursuant to this section.
(3)(4) Establish standards and guidelines to provide for the storage of
firearms, ammunition, and other weapons pursuant to this section by law
enforcement agencies. Such guidelines shall provide that:
(A) with the consent of the law enforcement agency taking
possession of a firearm, ammunition, or weapon under this section, an owner
may provide a storage container for the storage of such relinquished items;
(B) the law enforcement agency that takes possession of the firearm,
ammunition, or weapon may provide a storage container for the relinquished
item or items at an additional fee; and
(C) the law enforcement agency that takes possession of the firearm,
ammunition, or weapon shall present the owner with a receipt at the time of
relinquishment that includes the serial number and identifying characteristics
of the firearm, ammunition, or weapon and record the receipt of the item or
items in a log to be established by the Department.
(4)(5) Report on January 15, 2015, and annually thereafter to the House
and Senate Committees on Judiciary on the status of the program. The
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 13 of 19
2026
provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply
to the report to be made under this subdivision.
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. § 2308 is added to read:
§ 2308. STATEWIDE MODEL POLICY PROHIBITING FIREARMS
ACCESS BY PROHIBITED PERSONS
(a) On or before December 30, 2026, the Department of Public Safety shall
direct the Law Enforcement Advisory Board (LEAB) to adopt a statewide
model law enforcement policy addressing firearms access by persons who are
prohibited from possessing firearms pursuant to relief from abuse orders,
extreme risk protection orders, or other legal prohibitions. The policy shall
create a legal, safe, and fair process, including necessary forms and delineated
roles and responsibilities, for law enforcement agencies interacting with
federally licensed firearms dealers that are storing firearms for prohibited
persons. The policy shall address the following:
(1) legal removal of firearms from the scene of a domestic violence
incident;
(2) steps for inquiry and lawful removal of firearms by law enforcement
when serving protective orders;
(3) a process for notifying the plaintiff about service and relinquishment,
appropriate handling, and storage of firearms;
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 14 of 19
2026
(4) procedures for storage of firearms with federally licensed firearms
dealers and third parties, including informing the defendant about the option of
third-party storage; and
(5) methods of data collection about the number and type of firearms
surrendered, including descriptions of the firearms.
(b) On or before June 30, 2027, every state, county, and municipal law
enforcement agency shall adopt a model firearms surrender policy that
includes each component of the LEAB model. If an agency has not adopted a
policy on or before June 30, 2027, the agency shall be deemed to have adopted,
and shall follow and enforce, the LEAB model.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 4059 is amended to read:
§ 4059. RELINQUISHMENT, STORAGE, AND RETURN OF
DANGEROUS WEAPONS
(a) A person who is required to relinquish a dangerous weapon other than a
firearm in the person’s possession, custody, or control by an extreme risk
protection order issued under section 4053, 4054, or 4055 of this title shall
upon service of the order immediately relinquish the dangerous weapon to a
cooperating law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency shall
transfer the weapon to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and
Explosives for proper disposition.
(b)(1) A person who is required to relinquish a firearm in the person’s
possession, custody, or control by an extreme risk protection order issued
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 15 of 19
2026
under section 4053, 4054, or 4055 of this title shall, unless the court orders an
alternative relinquishment pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, upon
service of the order immediately relinquish the firearm to a cooperating law
enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed firearms dealer
relinquish the firearm pursuant to the procedures required by 20 V.S.A.
§ 2307.
(2)(A) The court may order that the person relinquish a firearm to a
person other than a cooperating law enforcement agency or an approved
federally licensed firearms dealer unless the court finds that relinquishment to
the other person will not adequately protect the safety of any person.
(B) A person to whom a firearm is relinquished pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall execute an affidavit on a form
approved by the Court Administrator stating that the person:
(i) acknowledges receipt of the firearm;
(ii) assumes responsibility for storage of the firearm until further
order of the court and specifies the manner in which he or she will provide
secure storage;
(iii) is not prohibited from owning or possessing firearms under
State or federal law; and
(iv) understands the obligations and requirements of the court
order, including the potential for the person to be subject to civil contempt
proceedings pursuant to subdivision (C) of this subdivision (2) if the person
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 16 of 19
2026
permits the firearm to be possessed, accessed, or used by the person who
relinquished the item or by any other person not authorized by law to do so.
(C) A person to whom a firearm is relinquished pursuant to
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be subject to civil contempt
proceedings under 12 V.S.A. chapter 5 if the person permits the firearm to be
possessed, accessed, or used by the person who relinquished the item or by any
other person not authorized by law to do so. In the event that the person
required to relinquish the firearm or any other person not authorized by law to
possess the relinquished item obtains access to, possession of, or use of a
relinquished item, all relinquished items shall be immediately transferred to the
possession of a law enforcement agency or approved federally licensed
firearms dealer pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c) A law enforcement agency or an approved federally licensed firearms
dealer that takes possession of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall photograph, catalogue, and store the item in accordance with
standards and guidelines established by the Department of Public Safety
pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2307(i)(3). [Repealed.]
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the lawful sale of
firearms or other items. [Repealed.]
(e) An extreme risk protection order issued pursuant to section 4053 of this
title or renewed pursuant to section 4055 of this title shall direct the law
enforcement agency, approved federally licensed firearms dealer, or other
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 17 of 19
2026
person in possession of a firearm under subsection (b) of this section to release
it to the owner upon expiration of the order. [Repealed.]
(f)(1) A law enforcement agency, an approved federally licensed firearms
dealer, or any other person who takes possession of a firearm for storage
purposes pursuant to this section shall not release it to the owner without a
court order unless the firearm is to be sold pursuant to subdivision (2)(A) of
this subsection. If a court orders the release of a firearm stored under this
section, the law enforcement agency or firearms dealer in possession of the
firearm shall make it available to the owner within three business days after
receipt of the order and in a manner consistent with federal law.
(2)(A)(i) If the owner fails to retrieve the firearm within 90 days after the
court order releasing it, the firearm may be sold for fair market value. Title to
the firearm shall pass to the law enforcement agency or firearms dealer for the
purpose of transferring ownership, except that the Vermont State Police shall
follow the procedure described in 20 V.S.A. § 2305.
(ii) The law enforcement agency or firearms dealer shall make a
reasonable effort to notify the owner of the sale before it occurs. In no event
shall the sale occur until after the court issues a final extreme risk protection
order pursuant to section 4053 of this title.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (2)(A), “reasonable effort” shall
mean notice shall be served as provided for by Rule 4 of the Vermont Rules of
Civil Procedure.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 18 of 19
2026
(B) Proceeds from the sale of a firearm pursuant to subdivision (A) of
this subdivision (2) shall be apportioned as follows:
(i) associated costs, including the costs of sale and of locating and
serving the owner, shall be paid to the law enforcement agency or firearms
dealer that incurred the cost; and
(ii) any proceeds remaining after payment is made to the law
enforcement agency or firearms dealer pursuant to subdivision (i) of this
subdivision (2)(B) shall be paid to the original owner. [Repealed.]
(g) A law enforcement agency shall be immune from civil or criminal
liability for any damage or deterioration of a firearm stored or transported
pursuant to this section. This subsection shall not apply if the damage or
deterioration occurred as a result of recklessness, gross negligence, or
intentional misconduct by the law enforcement agency. [Repealed.]
(h) This section shall be implemented consistent with the standards and
guidelines established by the Department of Public Safety under 20 V.S.A.
§ 2307(i). [Repealed.]
(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter:
(1) A dangerous weapon shall not be returned to the respondent if the
respondent’s possession of the weapon would be prohibited by state or federal
law.
VT LEG #390207 v.1

No. 134 Page 19 of 19
2026
(2) A dangerous weapon shall not be taken into possession pursuant to
this section if it is being or may be used as evidence in a pending criminal
matter.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 15, 2026
VT LEG #390207 v.1